











































White Paper

‘18Solution
solves problems with the modern educational model

Platform
built on blockchain technology

access to higher education across borders, for students and educators
Opportunity

Unlocking Higher Education

V1.6

This document contains proprietary information. Written consent is required
for distribution or duplication of any portion contained herein. ©2017, 2018—ODEM



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 2

Notice .......................................................................................................................... 1

1. Vision .................................................................................................................. 2

2. Executive Summary ....................................................................................3

3. The Problem/The Market Place.............................................................5

4. The ODEM Solution ..................................................................................... 7

5. Technology Platform ................................................................................ 10

6. Timeline .......................................................................................................... 33

7. ODEM Financial Ecosystem ................................................................. 33

8. Advantages  .................................................................................................34

9. Team and Partners.................................................................................... 36

10. ODEM Token Sale ........................................................................................41

11.  Our Accountability with Your Contributions ...............................49

12. Resources ......................................................................................................50

13. ODEMT, Legal, and Token Sale ............................................................52

14. Appendix A: Glossary of Terms .......................................................... 67

CONTENTSC



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 1

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

NOTICE

Notice
THE PERIOD FOR THE SALE OF ODEM TOKENS (ODEMT) WILL EXPIRE ON THE 
EARLIER OF THE FOLLOWING: (I) THE DATE ON WHICH THE MAXIMUM NUMBER OF 
TOKENS TO BE SOLD HAS BEEN SOLD BY ODEM SA OR (II) MARCH 19TH, 2018, THE 
CLOSING DATE OF THE TOKEN SALE. 

This Confidential Preliminary Product Whitepaper (this “Whitepaper”) has been 
prepared by ODEM SA, a Switzerland based public limited company (“ODEM SA”), for 
use by purchasers to whom ODEM SA is offering the opportunity to purchase up to 
238,200,000 of ODEMT, for the primary use in the ODEM Platform (“ODEM”)

DISCLAIMER – IMPORTANT NOTICE: Please read the notices in Schedule A carefully 
before proceeding to read this Whitepaper, which apply to all persons who read this 
document and may be updated.

Token sales are by their nature highly risky and participating in the token sale means 
taking high risks due to legal, regulatory, technical, untested market risks as well as any 
other potential unknown risks at the time of writing of this document.

This Whitepaper needs to be read together with the Terms & Conditions of the token sale.

N



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 2

1. Vision
Kevin Carey, author of The End of College: Creating the Future of Learning and the 
University of Everywhere, imagines a world in which the rigid four-year-degree model 
of post-secondary schooling and its associated student-debt burden fade into the past. 
He foresees a time when higher education becomes an affordable, lifelong process of 
intellectual and practical enrichment shaped by an individual’s professional and personal 
aspirations.

Major international publications like Forbes magazine, The Washington Post and The 
Economist have deemed the $4.6 trillion-to-$6 trillion global education market ripe for 
technological disruption. Our analysis suggests higher education is vulnerable because 
of escalating tuition costs and student debt burdens, the unjustified amount of time 
required to earn a degree and a mismatch between college training and job skills 
demanded by employers.   

After assessing higher learning’s weaknesses, our team concluded a solution lies in an 
On-Demand Education Marketplace, or what we call ODEM. The platform is a single, 
accessible, and distributed network that allows students to seamlessly interact with 
professors and their academic partners in-person, onsite, in both local and international 
settings to raise the quality of accessible education at reasonable cost. 

VISION1



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 3

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

2. Executive Summary
Education is a global industry. Worldwide expenditures rose to an estimated $6 trillion 
in 20161,  with spending on higher learning forecasted to rise eight percent this year to 
$2.05 trillion2. Year-on-year growth in demand is fueled globally by population growth 
and an expanding middle class in Asia and Africa. Despite prospects for increased 
spending, students face many hurdles and restrictions that reduce the accessibility 
to quality education experiences. Rising tuition costs, student debt and layers of 
intermediaries, including universities, shut out many prospective students, ensuring that 
the highest quality education is overwhelmingly allocated to global elites. For many, 
higher education is neither accessible, affordable nor relevant to students with ever-
changing desires.

The ODEM platform has been made possible by the emergence of cutting-edge 
blockchain technology that allows qualified and trusted members of the education 
industry to create customized curriculum and experiences and offer them directly 
to the market. The ODEM platform further provides students with more choices for 
housing, transportation and other necessities. It allows international and local students 
to take ownership of their education. ODEM will facilitate live, in-classroom experiences, 
supported by online capabilities.

ODEM is more than just an education marketplace. Through Ethereum-based smart 
contracts, agreement between students and professors will be attained with the least 
possible involvement of intermediaries. Our mission is to make education from the 
world’s top educators accessible and affordable to everyone.

1 https://www.forbes.com/sites/jordanshapiro/2013/09/11/grab-a-share-of-educations-6-trillion-marketplace/ 

2 https://2u.com/about/press/2u-to-acquire-getsmarter/

EXECUTIVE SUMMARY2



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 4

Stories from Two Students

Daniel

Daniel is nearing the end of a four-year degree program at a U.S. college. He’s 
studied diligently and is excited to embark on his working life. However, as graduation 
approaches he faces the prospect of monthly payments on his student loans. While 
his parents tapped their retirement savings to defray the cost of his education, it will 
probably take Daniel decades to pay off his debt. Daniel’s high-cost college education 
may not have prepared him for meaningful employment. Chances are he will struggle to 
find fulfilling work right away, ending up in a low-paying job that hampers his ability to 
repay his loans.

Mei Lin

Mei Lin was just 20 years old when she first traveled to America from her native Taiwan. 
Curious and excited during her brief trip, she returned home determined to live and study 
in the U.S. She describes that decision as life changing. While Mei Lin did eventually 
attend US community college and study technology, it was only after overcoming many 
challenges and hurdles. Her inability to speak English fluently complicated everything 
from grocery shopping to finding an apartment. She flourished, but only thanks to the 
personal contact she had with professors, teaching assistants, classmates and friends. 
Mei Lin completed her education and now works in her area of specialization.

These are not separate instances, but the story of Daniel and Mei is shared by millions 
of students based globally. The ODEM platform unifies the diverse needs of students, 
educators and service providers by using leading-edge blockchain technology to improve 
transparency and efficiency, reducing cost and making education accessible to all.

EXECUTIVE SUMMARY2



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 5

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

3. The Problem/The Market Place

Lack of Access to Quality Higher Education

Improving accessibility means addressing the challenges that students face in acquiring 
a great education. We recognize that overcoming obstacles is an important part of 
growing up. However, we also believe that creating a global marketplace can assist 
students in accessing many education options, customizing course selections, and 

managing the acquisition of student accommodation and transportation. 

Institutional Barriers

Entrenched, Rigid Legacy Models

Several hurdles stand in the way of achieving broader student 
access to traditional, in-person higher-quality education. 
Professors, keen to increase their impact in the wider learning 
community, are often restricted by their home colleges on 
how, when and on what terms they can share their expertise. 
Students are hampered in their quest for knowledge by 
rigid controls on enrollment, course prerequisites and other 
onerous requirements. Gaining admission to some elite 
colleges can be more difficult and fraught with greater 

uncertainty than graduating. A rapidly changing world means education must adapt. 
The old paradigm of four-year and graduate education fails to address the importance of 
calibrating education to meet the needs of students and employers.

THE PROBLEM3



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 6

Financial Barriers

Exponential Increases in Tuition Costs

Rising tuition costs and disadvantages of geography also 
complicate the process. For students committed to lifelong 
learning, a lack of customizable options inhibits their ability to 
update their knowledge as their careers evolve. Additionally, 
access to the best educators is controlled and the cost inflated 
by the institutions who employ them.

Geographic & Societal Barriers...

... and the Limits of Online Education

The emergence of online teaching systems has drawn 
attention to the limits of what students can get from the 
online education experience. Social and geographical context 
is lost in the world of online education. We believe in ODEM’s 
emphasis on in-class teaching.

THE PROBLEM3



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 7

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

4. The ODEM Solution

Overview 

Using the power of blockchain technology and its smart contract-based payment 
platform, ODEM will enable students and professors to interact directly and participate in 
the exchange of education and learning, without the involvement of intermediaries. Our 
goal is to make quality education more accessible and affordable to a broader audience. 

Demand for U.S.-based education has risen enormously with students from Asia, Africa, 
South America and the Middle East, seeking access to traditional four-year colleges as 
well as providers of customized training and curriculum.

ODEM and it’s secure, blockchain-based platform allows students to seamlessly interact 
with educators and to seize opportunities to access custom-designed courses and 
education programs. Students can use ODEM to search for curriculum that meets their 
needs.

ODEM addresses many of the industry’s challenges with:

• Access to both local and international onsite, and in-person educational 
experiences. While ODEM can provide any type of learning experience, the 
program emphasizes on-the-ground education at elite institutions around the 
globe.

• A single education community in which students, educators and service providers 
can communicate and participate directly in a secure environment.

• A more efficient way of sharing and understanding educational requirements, 
goals and details to meet the rapidly changing workforce and the globalization of 
students and educators.

• A single, real-time system of negotiation, curriculum description and payments on 
an agreed-upon schedule.

• An integrated academic and curriculum schedule builder with details available to 
all participants to ensure development of educational programs that are clearly 
laid out and agreed upon by all parties.

THE ODEM SOLUTION4



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 8

• Capacity to perform back-and-forth language translation at all levels of education 
procurement to ensure that important nuances in program requests are not lost in 
translation.

The ODEM Ecosystem

THE ODEM SOLUTION4

Investors, Philanthropists,
Hiring Companies

Sponsor education for
students and content

for employees

Students, Executives,
Education Companies,

HR Departments
Network eciencies achieved

through scale significantly
reduce education costs 

Define and build customized
education programs that
meet specific educational

needs

Services Providers, 
Translators, Facilities,

Travel, Lodging, Catering
Increase new markets and

expand business
opportunities

Educators
Expand student base and

teaching opportunities

Develop and deliver
relevant educational

content 



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 9

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Our Industry Experience

Inspired by Excelorators

The ODEM team was inspired by the success of U.S.-based Excelorators, a premier 
provider of education services to overseas students, executives and managers seeking 
exposure to America’s elite learning institutions and corporate campuses. On that foun- 
dation, ODEM is establishing a new industry standard of satisfaction by revolutionizing 
the quality and accessibility of high-impact educational experiences. Excelorators will be 
the exclusive on the ground service provider of ODEM education programs in the United 
States. Students and educators from Excelorators will pilot and test ODEM and form the 
basis for mass adoption. 

Excelorators is best suited to serve in this capacity for three main reasons:

• Its years of experience in selling, fulfilling and delivering programs and 
educational events has built a wealth of travel industry and academic contacts 
and an understanding of what it takes to create and deliver a successful education 
experience to those traveling from abroad. 

• The company’s staff and leadership and their understanding of the logistics of 
building an inclusive education ecosystem in which products are developed and 
sold.

• A seasoned team with both industry experience and the appropriate professional 
relationships to leverage opportunities in the maturing financial technology sector 
and to resolve issues involving cross-border payments.

THE ODEM SOLUTION4



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 10

5. Technology Platform

Overview

In direct response to the challenges faced by industry veteran, Excelorators, we are 
creating an online platform that will provide for direct, transparent creation, negotiation 
and delivery of education programs that satisfy the changing needs of global students. 
The platform works in conjunction with an inclusive and decentralized payment system 
for secure transactions.

Backend Technology Overview

The ODEM model will create an integrated platform where all types of students and 
student representatives can create and request services for education programs. 
Educators and educational service providers can receive requests for program fulfillment 
and delivery services all through a frictionless, smart contract.

ODEM: The On-Demand Education Marketplace

ODEM is a comprehensive platform that allows students, educators and service providers 
in the education industry to participate in a direct, decentralized, real-time marketplace. 
It empowers participants to search, select and purchase existing educational products as 
well as create, request and negotiate customized education experiences in person and 
online. Unlike online education providers like Coursera  and Khan Academy, the ODEM 
platform focuses on creating real-time, in-person educational programs. Because of this, 
the ODEM platform is designed to accommodate not only the delivery of a single course, 
but also the accompanying services and scheduling that are included in accommodat- 
ing a group of students traveling to a location for one day, a month or even a year. Since 
the majority of our current offerings are onsite educational experiences, we have built an 
off-blockchain capability to manage a range of tasks, including the negotiation of costs, 
the securing of service providers and the creation of student certificates.

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 11

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

The ODEM platform is a multi-dimensional education marketplace, accommodating 
participants, costs, locations and scheduling. The effort to fund, plan and host a complete 
in-person event requires certain technical nuances and requirements that translate into 
well managed schedules.

How it Works

Whether for a one-day lecture or a more extensive week-long training event, the ODEM 
platform connects students and educators with course offerings at any price point 
anywhere around the world. And with a growing community of users, ODEM platform 
will be the ideal way to buy or sell  customized education and training courses at a cross 
border level.

ODEM will be powered by a set of programs deployed on the Ethereum blockchain. Use 
of Ethereum will provide transparency and ease of payment.

Users will login onto the platform, decide which services to purchase, and the record of 
such purchase is stored onto the blockchain. Functions and activities performed prior to 
purchase, like searching for or adding new curriculum will be handled by the off-chain 
platform.

Why Blockchain?

Blockchain technology has fundamentally expanded the capacity for people to 
coordinate. The ODEM platform is a collaboration tool for a community working together 
to make education more affordable and more accessible. To understand how and why 
the ODEM platform leverages this powerful new technology, three distinct blockchain use 
cases are examined.

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 12

Use Case 1 
Decentralizing the Mar-
ketplace Business Model

• Tokens serve as vouchers 
in the use of the ODEM 
platform that can be 
used by Educators and 
Sponsors of Educators 
to eliminate the platform 
fees incurred using the 
software.

• The token sale jumpstarts 
the community and 
development of the ODEM 
platform which supports 
and empowers that 
community using tokens.

Use Case 2
Complex Coordination 
across many different 
stakeholders

• A decentralized ledger 
helps maintain identities, 
govern commitments 
and ensure that 
algorithms used to 
coordinate between many 
stakeholders are secure 
and fair.

• Execution of 
commitments can 
be automated and 
community members are 
incentivized and rewarded 
for being good actors 
within the platform.

Use Case 3 
Fast, low friction in 
system Payments across 
currencies

• Traditional payment 
systems are inefficient 
when currency exchange 
is involved and when there 
are multiple participants 
in a transaction. 

• Cryptocurrency systems 
integrated with the 
conventional banking 
system provide the best of 
all worlds: speed, security 
and flexibility.

Use Case 1: The ODEM Token Layer

The tokenization of the ODEM Business model, a software-as-a-service platform, is the 
first use of blockchain technology. The ODEM community will be launched through the 
public sale of an ERC-20 token, ODEMT, that will serve as the software license in the 
ODEM platform. The economic model for ODEMT is based on Discount Token research 
developed by the Sweetbridge Foundation. This design helps to isolate the utility of the 
token from fluctuations ensuring that use of the tokens is always advantageous. Through 
early participation in the ODEM platform, token participants jumpstart the community 
and fund the development. With the launch of the platform token-holding community 
members will immediately have access to software at a discounted cost, enabling 
immediate access to lower-cost educational services. 

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 13

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Benefits of acquiring the ODEM tokens during the token sale 
include:

• Immediate membership in the ODEM community

• Discounted use of the ODEM platform and services

• The power to sponsor Educators and Students to reduce their costs for 
participating in the ODEM ecosystem

Thanks to the discount token framework, buying tokens is more than just a temporary 
transaction. It is a reusable resource enabling ongoing participation in the platform. 

An important aspect of community is the concept of Identity. As part of the initial token 
distribution process, a Know Your Customer (KYC) process will be strictly observed. 

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5

Tokens Owned
in ODEM Wallet

ODEM
Tokens Activated

Tokens Locked

Educators and Service Providers 
pay platform fees on execution of 
smart contract. ODEM Tokens 
reduce platform fees.

Tokens returned
to ODEM wallet
after transaction
is complete.

Program fulfillment and 
delivery completed

Payment Settlement and 
Contract Completed

Education Program Created

Educator and Service 
Providers confirmed

Platform fees discounted
proportional to

ODEM Tokens escrowed

ODEM
Token Layer



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 14

Inside of the ODEM platform, Identity will also include credentials of students and 
educators to provide the highest level of participation while delivering blockchain-level 
security.

Use Case 2: 

Managed Services (Usage): the ODEM Coordination Layer

In use case 2, ODEM leverages a combination of blockchain and artificial intelligence 
technologies to create an optimized ecosystem that automates the process of pairing 
interested students (the consumers) with educators and service providers (the providers).

The educational programs provided are complex events requiring commitments from 
and coordination between students, educators and services providers with regards to 
an agreed upon cost, time, place and curriculum. While individual stakeholders provide 
their preferences, it falls to an artificial intelligence service to identify and organize these 
preferences into viable events which meet all parties’ requirements.

At first glance this is not a blockchain use case at all. However, when coordinating 
between so many parties, the blockchain allows participants to make commitments that 
indicate their participation as a function of the commitment of other parties. In this way, 
the AI system is able to discover solutions to the coordination problem that participants 
have pre-committed to via a blockchain transaction.

Coordination Layer, Working Architecture: 

Use case two is the brain of the ODEM platform and a great deal of thought has gone 
into realizing it correctly. Pending our ongoing research, the approach involves multiple 
layers of security to create and set the conditions for the pre-commitment smart 
contracts. Key points of consideration include:

1. Use case two may be implemented on a consortium network using the Quorum 

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 15

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

codebase, an open source code base for launching enterprise grade blockchain 
networks based on Ethereum but for which participation is governed by a 
community. In the case of ODEM this community would be managed through 
open collaboration with all stakeholders. An additional benefit of this solution is 
insulation against the growing costs and computational limitations associated with 
leveraging the Ethereum public network.

2. Data representing the pre-commitment criteria of all stakeholders is 
multidimensional and not ideal for storing on-chain; however, by signing 
transactions when commitment criteria are legitimately edited and broadcasting 
hashes of the criteria on-chain, it is always possible to check the validity of the 
commitment criteria before confirming stakeholder commitments to a new 
education event.

3.  The optimization and machine learning algorithms used to identify groups of 
stakeholders who collectively meet the requirements for an educational program 
can be secured through validation games in accordance with the TrueBit Protocol. 
While the item above ensure that the data used to find matches is secure, the 
validation games ensure the complex computations in the AI services are secure.

 
TrueBit enables trustless smart contracts, in theory, to securely perform any 
computation task. Moreover, TrueBit vastly reduces the number of redundant 
network node computations used in traditional Ethereum smart contracts. Presently 
every Ethereum miner has to independently replicate each smart contract action 
in its entirety, whereas TrueBit outsources most computation work to a handful of 
entities. In this way, TrueBit makes secure computing affordable. 

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 16

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5

STUDEN T  EDUCATION REQUEST
P A R A M E T E R S

CURRICULUM COST EDUCATOR FACILITIES CATERING
DINING

LODGING TRANSPORT SERVICE
PROVIDERS

SCHEDULES

C U R R I C U L U M

E D U C ATO R

FAC I L I T I E S

C O S T

C AT E R I N G  a n d
D I N I N G

LO D G I N G

T R A N S P O R T

S E R V I C E  P R OV I D E R S

E D U C ATO R ’ S  &  P R OV I D E R ’ S  
S C H E D U L E

Identifies which ODEM Educators 
and Service Providers meet the 
requested education program 
parameters of:

Student requests program and 
includes desired curriculum, 
location, dates and other 
requirements. The ODEM Program 
Selection Generator uses the 
requests’ parameters to identify 
the appropriate resources and 
creates the program.

Student is delivered their customized 
education program and contract. 

ODEM Program Selection Generator 
selected program resources and 
generates smart contract to facilitate 
fulfillment, delivery and payment.

C USTO MIZED EDUCATION P ROGRAM
CURRICULUM COST EDUCATOR FACILITIES CATERING

DINING
LODGING TRANSPORT SERVICE

PROVIDERS
SCHEDULES

PROGRAM SELECTION
GENERATOR



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 17

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

How Ecosystem Optimization Creates Value Through Waste 
Reduction

With a combination of blockchain transparency and ODEM’s artificial intelligence 
discovery, the ODEM program selection generator identifies a full set of service providers 
and the exact subset of members participating in the ODEM services community 
that fit the criteria of the program (product) specifications and the resulting event is 
automatically orchestrated. 

Participating in the ODEM platform is based on users providing their pre-approval 
criteria; unlike a platform merely matching token buyer and seller, like AirBnB, the 
ODEM platform aligns many parties to achieve an advanced “match” where all parties’ 
requirements must be matched precisely as they have already accepted valid service 
engagements in the manner of AirBnB’s automatic acceptance booking feature. The 
fundamental limitation in ecosystem level optimization is the ability to account for 
the needs and restrictions of all parties concurrently; thankfully, advances in machine 
learning and optimization techniques make this a solvable problem and blockchain allows 
it the necessary contract automation to facilitate coordinated execution.

The ODEM platform is in fact an interconnected network of software services ranging 
from traditional backend databases, to mathematical micro-services to smart contracts. 
The software architecture is micro-service oriented where the blockchain serves as the 
source of truth regarding validity of user data, including the requirements they have 
specified and the commitments they have made. Collectively, the system provides a 
genius level, perfectly honest middleman substitute, programmed to create as much 
value to stakeholders as is possible. A beneficial side effect of this approach is that 
inefficiencies and non-value add middle men fall out of the education supply chain. 

Use Case 3: Facilitating Payment

The ODEM platform requires a fast, pain-free solution for payments across currencies. 
This use case is commonly cited amongst blockchain projects and the ODEM team 
knows the value of harnessing the power of collaboration. While ODEM will remain 

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 18

blockchain-agnostic, we will consider solutions such as Stellar as a method to most 
effectively implement our settlement use case. Stellar is an open source protocol 
enabling a blockchain-based cross-border payments solution proven to significantly 
reduce transaction costs and increase transaction speeds. This solution will help financial 
institutions and consumers eliminate inefficiencies and frustrations in current cross-
border payment systems, including high fees, slow processing, error-prone transactions, 
and inefficient capital utilization.

Here are some examples of how the Stellar platform would perform key functions 
required for successful ODEM settlement:

1. The Stellar Foundation’s focus on integrating with the traditional financial system 
allows ODEM platform users to experience the benefits of the platform by making 
and receiving payments in their local currencies with their existing banks and 
financial service providers.

2. The Stellar blockchain is designed with less of the general functionality of the 
Ethereum Virtual Machine and a much greater focus on the remittance use case; 
by restricting the complexity, a simpler more secure payment system is enabled.

3. The Asset Issuance system on the Stellar public blockchain network supports the 
ODEM platform to serve the Anchor role by issuing tokenized educational assets 
which provide clear confirmations and audit trails for the financial transactions 
associate with ODEM orchestrated services.

Observations about Inter-chain Operations

The technical overview outlined in this section references three blockchain networks. 
While it is increasingly common to design systems by matching distinct blockchain 
use cases with the most suitable tools, it is non-trivial to integrate multiple chains. A 
good precedent for a multi chain solution can be found in the Mad Network solution 
architecture.

In the case of the ODEM platform, the use of the public Ethereum network ensures 
the system is trusted as access to the platform and periodic hashes of the state of the 
platform are broadcast on the public network. At this time, ODEM token functionality is 

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 19

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

considered sufficiently complex for the team to prefer the Turing Complete EVM over the 
use of Stellar for the public token. Nonetheless, use of the Ethereum Network will be kept 
to a minimum to avoid excess transactions costs on ODEM. 

An important technical characteristic of smart contracts is that they are passive. Each 
cross chain interaction is designed through the events the smart contracts emit. 

1. Escrowing tokens in the the discount smart contract will emit events that are 
logged in the coordination and payments layers to ensure a correct accounting 
of costs.

2. Collective commitment to an instance of an educational program on the ODEM 
(Quorum) Network emits an event to the Asset Issuing smart contract in Stellar.

3. Completion of required payments in the Stellar Network will emit an event to the 
ODEM Network and be used to update a variety of states including but not limited 
to student event credentials and other event related documents.

4. Completion of an educational program as determined by smart contracts in 
the ODEM Network will emit an event back to the Ethereum Network so that 
tokens escrowed for the purpose of offsetting fees associated with hosting 
the educational program on the ODEM platform will be resealed back to the 
stakeholder or their sponsor.

Using Smart Contracts for Securing Products  
and Payment Transactions

On the ODEM platform, Ethereum based smart contracts will ensure the services are 
accessed in a “trustless” manner.  “Trustless” does not mean that they can’t be trusted, 
but instead the necessity to  trust each other is not required. At a practical level, this 
means that a student can buy services from service providers sitting on the other side of 
the globe, without ever meeting them and without knowing whether they are an honest 
service provider. 

Inefficiencies attached to the current payment system – which allows paybacks can be 
mitigated through smart contracts. In a blockchain based smart contract, a non-payment 
by the student will block the services from being delivered, and non-delivery of services 

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 20

will automatically result in the students being refunded. Because of the immutable nature 
of the blockchain, the students can inspect the blockchain and make sure that they trust 
the delivery mechanism, and the service providers can make sure that the students have 
sufficient funds to pay for the services. Therefore, both execution and enforcement of the 
agreements between the parties will be done on smart contracts. 

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 21

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Figure 1: System Delivery Workflow - Off-chain 
and On-chain Processing

e e

e

REGISTER

Wallet Created

REGISTER

WALLET CREATED

CHOOSE EXISTING PROGRAM SUBMIT CONTENT

Courses, Lectures, Programs

CHECKOUT

Student or student representative 
receives ODEM system
response to proposal 

ACCEPTANCE OF PROGRAM

EST AMT based on the Program

EXECUTION OF 
SMART CONTRACT

FINALIZE PAYMENT

Once program is secured, system 
automatically creates the following:

1. Schedule with all details
2. Program Certificates
3. All other collateral

ODEM System / Web UIProcess ODEM

2a Create New Program
 Query DB - Create new 
 curriculum/schedules/request resources

2aProgram Request
Receives Requests

for Services:
Accepts, Declines

1 1

2 2

3

4 4

5 5

Negotiations Agree/Verify on Program Schedule/
Costs/Schedule/Terms of Payment

ODEM EDUCATION MANAGEMENT ENGINE

O-Chain Technology

ON-CHAIN TECHNOLOGY

SCHEDULE BUILDER

SMART CONTRACT TRANSACTION LAYER

Payments go out to all vendors

CONVERSION ENGINE

PAYMENT
RECEIVED

COMMISSION 
RECEIVED

CONVERT TO FIAT FIAT BANK

ODEM BANK

Professors Education Service
Providers

StudentsStudent Reps

$
$
$
$
$

EDUCATIONAL SERVICE PRO-
VIDERS

Figure 1. ODEM Platform Ecosystem and Payment Gateway illustrating on-chain 

 and off chain transactions during the purchase process

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 22

Process Description Technical

1a. Student sign up / 
Registration 

Logs into secure ODEM portal and:

• Create user login

• Create User wallet (in background)

• Create full profile to educational 
preferences, interests and goals

Off-chain

• Secure ODEM user account created 
with all credentials, details and 
preferences

On-chain

• Secure ODEM digital wallet created 
with connection to student’s fiat 
banking for easy transfer.

• ODEM will take proper legal 
assistance to make this feasible.

1b. Educator / Provider 
sign up / Registration

Logs into secure ODEM portal and:

• Create user login

• Create User wallet (in background)

• Create full profile including:

• Provider Type

• Location

• Availability

• Public or private (or ODEM 
Member only) profile listing

• Feature page assets including 
video, books or other products 
that provider offers they would like 
to include for promotion

• Notification preference and price 
point (notification for requested 
programs and price they are willing 
to consider)

Off-chain

• Secure ODEM user account created 
with all credentials, details and 
preferences

On-chain

• Secure ODEM digital wallet created 
with connection to educator’s fiat 
banking for easy transfer

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 23

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Process Description Technical

2. Student / student 
representative searches 
for and selects existing 
program

The ODEM interface will allow 
students to search for curriculum 
by:

• University or city location(s), 
classroom or event facilities

• Education themes, specific lecture 
topics or lecture series

• Translation services, 
accommodations, refreshments 
and meals, and other activities 
that enhance their educational 
experience

Off-chain

• Relational database with existing 
program, faculty, curriculum and 
service provider data is queried 
and served back to user via web 
interface

2. Educator / service 
provider submits 
content: courses, 
lectures, programs

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 24

Process Description Technical

2b. Student / student 
representative creates 
new program

Students who do not find what 
they are searching for on the 
system are free to create their own 
program data and submit it for 
approval and fulfillment by edu-
cators and service providers. They 
can:

• Request modified version of exist- 
ing program

• Request custom program

• Create new programs and 
curriculum and share for bidding 
with educators and providers

*NOTE: Educators and service 
providers can also create their own 
program data and submit it for 
approval and fulfillment by other 
educators and service providers.

They can also modify version of 
existing programs.

Off-chain

• User creates new program content 
that is then verified to meet 
neces- sary requirements and once 
approved, will be added to relational 
database with existing program, 
faculty, curriculum and service 
provider data is queried and served 
back to user via web interface.

2b. Educator / service 
provider receives and 
responds to request for 
program

Once a request is completed, 
negotiations between the student 
(buyer) and the educator and 
service providers (suppliers) 
respond until all specific require-
ments and requests are met at the 
negotiated rate

Off-chain

• An alert is sent to educators and 
service providers who have met the 
criteria for selection in the provider 
database.

• Suppliers can then accept requests 
and responses are then aggregated.

• Once all request for services are me 
a complete response is returned to 
the buyer.

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 25

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Process Description Technical

3. Student or student 
representative receives 
ODEM system response 
to proposal

Once the buyer creates and 
confirms the program details, the 
buyer will have four options to 
negotiate and secure the price of 
their product:

• Accept the system-selected 
(default) supplier services and 
costs

• Consider ODEM suggested 
alternative suppliers that meet 
their budget

• Submit a request to suppliers 
with another price and accept 
responses from request

• Open the program to the ODEM 
student community for smaller 
groups wishing to fill a program 
that requires a minimum of 
attendees

Off-Chain

• Supplier creates new program 
content that is then verified to meet 
necessary requirements and once 
approved, will be added to relational 
database with existing program, 
faculty, curriculum and service 
provider data is queried and served 
back to user via web interface.

On-chain

• NOTE: On-chain activity does 
not commence until agreement is 
reached

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 26

Process Description Technical

4. Acceptance of 
program

Once program and all service 
needs are met, the program can 
be officially ‘accepted’ by client. 
Payments will be disbursed ac-
cordingly to the program terms, 
conditions and schedule.

• The smart contract becomes active 
once transactions are initiated.

• Program Contract (includes)

• All terms & conditions

• Dates and detailed schedule

• Participant manifest

• Costs and payment schedule

• Service providers

Off-chain

• Upon acceptance of program and 
all details, data is handed off via 
system ODEM API to Solidity smart

• contract system from Web back-end 
estimate acceptance system

• All necessary data is fed to On-chain 
system to then determine smart 
contract to be implemented based 
on program details, schedule, costs, 
and deposit schedule.

On-chain

• Initiation of smart contract instance 
(or multiple smart contract)

• Establishment of contract payment 
schedule based on terms and 
conditions

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 27

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Process Description Technical

4. Execution of smart 
contract

Once program is under contract, 
the ODEM system will generate:

• A finalized web-based event site 
with event details, participant 
rosters, speakers times and event 
locations

• Availability of attendee ticket to 
allow additional sign-ups to public 
(or private groups)

• Schedule future deposits and 
payments

Off-chain

• ODEM Estimator and fulfillment 
systems send data through ODEM 
API to event management platform

• Suppliers are requested to confirm 
all schedules and commitments on 
event site

• Ticket sales made available through 
event site when desired

• Event management systems sends 
supplier confirmations of final 
scheduling and commitment via API 
to ODEM smart contract engine for 
terms and conditions and additional 
payments from schedule

On-chain

• Smart contract engine executes 
supplier terms and conditions

5. Completion of sched-
uled payments and 
final notices prior to 
program

• As the program start date 
approaches, notification alerts 
are sent to all suppliers and 
the buyer with final details and 
confirmation to ensure the success 
of an accurately executed program 
experience

• Final payments from the buyer 
will be made and sent to suppliers 
accordingly

Off-chain

• Event management engine sends 
confirmation alerts to all buyers 
and suppliers for final review of 
requirements

On-chain

• Payments on schedule continue as 
designated

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 28

Process Description Technical

5a. Program fulfillment • Verification of final list of 
participants and will be uploaded 
to event website

• Automatic generation of student 
certificates, entry badges, 
curriculum material and other 
requested collateral

Off-chain

• Program management component 
creates and delivers via email 
alert all necessary curriculum and 
program collateral

• Event management engine 
generates necessary badges and 
sends final alert to participants to 
verify preferences

• Incidental expenses are tallied up 
and sent via API to on-chain smart 
contract as single transaction

On-chain

• Smart contract logs any revenue 
from additional purchased tickets

5b. Program comple-
tion

• System-generated request of 
confirmation from the buyer of 
successful program completion 
and fulfillment

• Final payment to all suppliers will 
be instantly paid

Off-chain

• Participants/buyers sign off on 
completion of program and all 
supplier delivery

• Confirmation is rolled up and sent 
via API to on-chain smart contracts)

On-chain

• Any final payouts made to suppliers

• Fees paid to ODEM SA

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 29

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Process Description Technical

5c. Post program 
activity

• Supplier surveys sent to buyer to 
rate educators and suppliers

• These surveys will ensure the 
quality of the ODEM model and be 
used for process improvements 
and contribute to ODEM reputation 
scoring

Off-chain

• Request for rating send to all 
participants

• Rating requests, once complete 
initiate API send to smart contracts 
for ODEM system incentives (which 
are added to program costs)

On-chain

• Students/buyers receive rewards for 
completing program surveys

• Initiation of student credits 
on blockchain contributing 
to blockchain-based ODEM 
accreditation*

Platform Features and Benefits

Current Model ODEM  Solution Benefits

Client creates request directly 
via phone or email. Must cycle 
through many layers and nego-
tiations

Easily Request Lectures/
Programs through ODEM 
portal.

Request captured accurately 
and instantly put out to bid, 
triggering fulfillment process. 
Customer is matched with the 
program with the dates desired 
at lower overhead.

Extensive back and forth with 
client, partners and sales

System facilitates offers 
between customer and ODEM 
providers.

ODEM providers accept project 
based on mutually agreed-up-
on price with client. Middlemen 
costs are eliminated.  

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 30

Current Model ODEM  Solution Benefits

Difficult to secure speakers 
and facilities before client will 
make a commitment and leave 
deposit. 

ODEM Client request can only 
be completed once all resourc-
es are committed.

Using smart contracts, 
payments are exchanged at 
specified dates based on deliv-
erables in terms and conditions 
of contract, only once all re-
sources are secured and com-
mitted.

Creation of online schedule 
only if time permitting, and all 
done via manual input.

Schedule is built automatically 
as part of schedule request.

Removes uncertainty and last 
minute requests to program 
schedule and fulfillment, as 
event schedule is created 
online directly from terms, con-
ditions through smart contract.

Unpredictable payments 
causing subsequent delays in 
payouts to vendors, resources, 
facility and speakers.

Payments managed through 
ODEM smart contracts.

All payments are processed 
within  ODEM to be paid out 
specifically when product 
terms and conditions are met, 
preventing delays in payouts, 
building trust among all parties.

Program curriculum are created 
ad hoc by a combined effort 
from sales staff and program 
coordinators with little input 
from speakers/educators.

Program and curriculum 
creation and ownership with 
lifetime royalty on programs 
used in the future.

Speakers from high-impact 
universities and businesses 
have already been engaged to 
design and create their own 
programs and curriculum. This 
drastically increases the quality 
of the programs and incentiv-
izes clients to utilize programs 
developed by experts. 

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 31

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Current Model ODEM  Solution Benefits

Service providers are con-
tracted on a per-case basis, 
feedback is not collected and 
quality not measured. 

Vetting, securing and rating of 
all service providers in system.

Service providers are vetted 
by the community through a 
rating system (initially in the 
alpha-and-beta phases of de-
velopment) allowing customers 
to select from those who have 
had prior work (similar to the 
rating system used by Upwork.
com).

User Roles Redefined

Who uses the ODEM platform and how are they empowered? The following chart shows 
how participants will engage and benefit from ODEM.

Role Description of Use Advantages

BUYER

Student or anyone who creates 
custom educational experienc-
es for these students (student 
representatives)

• Become a buyer and use the 
ODEM platform

• Search for and enroll in existing 
educational programs

• Design your own program 
or partner with educators to 
design them

• Students can create their own 
programs that can be resold on 
the ODEM network, earning an 
ongoing royalty

• Become a program creator and 
earn royalties from future sales

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 32

Role Description of Use Advantages

EDUCATORS

• Professors

• Speakers

• Teachers

• Lecturers

Educators can:

• Sign up

• Create a professional profile

• Share availability and expected 
compensation

• Develop original curriculum and 
educational programs

• Re-use program curriculum and 
other educational products to 
feature on profile page for sale 
and promotion

• Review and consult on 
curriculum development and 
program ideas

• Rewarded with ODEM tokens 
for early Sign-up

• Respond to (bid on) program 
requests 

• Earn compensation and 
ongoing royalties from reuse of 
original content

SERVICE PROVIDERS

• Educational facilities 

• Translators

• Program creators

• Program coordinators

• Videographers/photographers

• Restaurateurs/Caterers

• Transportation Providers

• Accommodations Providers

Service Providers:

• Sign up

• Create a professional profile

• Share availability and expected 
compensation

• Rewarded with ODEM tokens 
for early sign-up

• Respond to (bid on) program 
requests

TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM5



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 33

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

6. Timeline

DECEMBER ‘17
Launch pre-token sale
for funding ODEM model.

FEBRUARY ‘18
Open token sale. Begin 
ALPHA content and provider 
listing for BETA testing.

JUNE ‘18
Launch ODEM 1.0 BETA.

DECEMBER ‘18
Launch ODEM 2.0 BETA.

SEPTEMBER ‘18
ODEM 1.0 live.

MARCH ‘18
Close token sale.

TIMELINE

7. ODEM Financial Ecosystem

ODEM Token and Payment Gateway

ODEM platform participants will conduct all transactions within the ODEM platform. The 
ODEM Token provides users with discounts on platform service fees. Payments will be 
allowed in the user’s currency of choice (see use case #3 above). The token itself will be 
built on the Ethereum Token Standard, also known as ERC 20.

The Digital Wallet

A digital wallet is an online or mobile account in which users can store all payment 
information for ODEM Tokens. Wallets will be integrated on the ODEM platform for 
educators, students and other service providers. 

TIMELINE, ODEM FINANCIAL ECOSYSTEM6, 7



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 34

8. Advantages 

Education Supplier Service Fees

Service fees will be generated by the creation and listing of education lectures, courses 
and content on the platform. These fees will be automatically calculated according to 
flexible supplier fee structures and added to the listing prices selected by educators 
when they publish educational content. Additionally, service providers suppliers have the 
ability to gain a share of these fees.

Inside the ODEM platform, suppliers will be incentivized to join the platform through free 
initial tokens allocated from the ODEM Rewards token distributions. Once suppliers sign 
up and create profiles, they must adhere to the supplier fee structures.

Initial reward structures will be based on three factors, which will transition as the 
platform develops. These factors include:

• Time of Adoption 

• Reputation 

• Volume

Time of Adoption: The first 100 suppliers that sign up and create profiles on the ODEM 
platform will receive  the supplier fees as additional discount. The next 400 suppliers will 
receive a 50 percent bonus and the last 1000 suppliers to join the network will receive 25 
percent bonus. 

ADVANTAGES8



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 35

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Reputation: Reputation is an important metric of quality and will eventually become 
the most important driver of supplier discounts/bonuses, as well as positioning within 
the platform. Initially, reputation will be established from university rankings. Suppliers 
listing their content and services out of the top 100 universities will receive a one percent 
discount for which percentile they fall. For example, professors from universities listed 
1-10 will receive a 10 percent discount while professors from universities listed 90-100 
will receive a one percent discount. Upon launching of the platform, customer feedback 
and rating will begin to be incorporated and eventually become the dominant factor for 
validation of reputation. 

Volume: Suppliers will also achieve discounts through volume successes on the ODEM 
network. Volume discounts of 5-25 percent will be available for revenue generated from 
education lectures, courses and content purchased on the ODEM platform. Adjustments 
will be made over time to properly align the incentives with actual business intelligence 
and results.

Education Supplier Royalty Structuring

Within the ODEM payment ecosystem, both students and educators have a unique 
opportunity to earn ongoing royalties for the contribution of programs and program 
curriculum. Here are two possible scenarios.

Example One: Professor-developed Curriculum

The following chronicles a typical university professor’s role on the ODEM Platform:

• The professor is contracted by the ODEM platform to speak at a program and 
receives payment.

• Upon speaking at the event, the professor sees opportunities to create more 
unique curriculum based on his/her experience with specific student populations.

• The professor develops and submits a custom program and curriculum based on 

ADVANTAGES8



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 36

previous program experience and understanding of market requirements.

• New students search the education marketplace, discover new curriculum that 
meets their needs and enroll for the professor’s future programs.

• As the original curriculum creator, the professor earns a royalty, or  percentage of 
the price of the program curriculum.

• The professor would also earn royalties from subsequent uses of the programs.

Example Two: Student-developed Curriculum
• A student or a student representative can create curriculum based on their own 

needs. 

• Upon inputting their requirements into ODEM, and going through the process 
of building their curriculum/schedule, the proposal is distributed for ‘bids’ to 
professors and educational providers. Once secured, confirmed and validated by 
community as useful, the program can be used again in the future, generating 
royal- ties/ODEM reward tokens.

• The program is officially added to the search engine for future students to review 
and purchase. 

9. Team and Partners

Advisory Board

Steve Jarding,  EDUCATION AND LEADERSHIP CURRICULUM ADVISER

Professor Steve Jarding is an international educator, lecturer, writer 
and political consultant. He has been on the faculty at Harvard 
University since 2004. Steve is a founding partner of the international 
consulting company, SJB Strategies International. Steve lectures is an 
expert in the field of communication for next-generation leadership.

ADVANTAGES, TEAM AND PARTNERS8, 9



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 37

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Ingo Fiedler,  BLOCKCHAIN AND ECONOMIC ADVISOR

Ingo is a co-founder of SICOS and a director of Hamburg University’s 
Blockchain Research Lab. An adjunct professor at Concordia 
University in Canada, Ingo is also an economist and an expert in the 
analysis of token-sale economics.

Sven Beiker,  TECHNOLOGY ADVISOR

Sven Beiker is the Managing Director of Silicon Valley Mobility, the 
mobility consulting and advisory firm in Palo Alto (CA). The firm 
drives the future of mobility along the four trends automation, 
communication, electrification, commoditization in serving startups, 
investors, and corporations claiming their share of the mobility sector 
through innovative products and business opportunities. Sven brings 
to bear his expertise developed over 20+ years at BMW, McKinsey, 
and Stanford University. In addition to his consulting business, Sven is 
a Lecturer at the Graduate School of Business at Stanford University 
where he instructs students on strategies related to future mobility.

Advisory Entities

KPMG, Switzerland

KPMG, one of our earliest advisor, has helped ODEM SA to navigate Switzerland’s legal 
framework. KPMG is assisting ODEM on the creation of the legal structure in preparation 
for the ODEM token sale, and is also representing ODEM SA before the Switzerland 
Regulators and Tax Authorities. KPMG has assisted ODEM SA in drafting and finalizing 
legal aspects of the white- paper.

TEAM AND PARTNERS9



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 38

SICOS

SICOS guides startups through the process of conceiving, planning, and implementing 
digital token sales. SICOS is primarily responsible for connecting startups with relevant 
partners for developing a token sale platform and drafting a workable business model. 
The SICOS team also has expertise in compiling token-sale whitepapers and other 
relevant communication documents. It also provides ongoing support to developers of 
blockchain-based business models. SICOS helped ODEM in conceiving the business plan, 
structuring the token economics, the white paper and various other relevant strategic 
decisions.

BlockScience

BlockScience is a technology research and analytics firm specializing in the design 
and evaluation of decentralized economic systems. BlockScience provides academic 
grade research and advanced analytics for the emerging economic order. BlockScience 
supports mathematical design and analysis of token economics, provides analytics as a 
service for popular public blockchain networks and develops machine learning micro-
services for use in decentralized applications. BlockScience assisted ODEM in developing 
the mathematical model for the utility of the ODEMT.

Core Team

Richard Maaghul, CEO

Rich is a seasoned Silicon Valley entrepreneur with more than  
two decades of direct experience in emerging-and-disruptive 
technologies. In addition to co-founding ODEM.IO partner 
Excelorators Inc., Rich has delivered strategic solutions to Chevron 
Corp. and other corporations. As CEO of ODEM.IO, he is committed 

TEAM AND PARTNERS9



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 39

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

to using blockchain technology to expand student access to  
high-quality education. 

J. William Bayrd II, COO
Bill is a natural leader, innovator and thinker. The founder of three 
companies, including Excelorators Inc., ODEM.IO’s education  
partner, he was an early developer of the ODEM.IO concept. Bill has 
a Doctor of Pharmacy from the University of Tennessee Health 
Science Center. Passionate about big, world-changing ideas, he 
served six years in the U.S. Marine Corps Reserve as a combat 
engineer and explosives technician.

Michael Zargham,  CHIEF SYSTEMS ENGINEER
Michael has a Systems Engineering Ph.D. with a focus on optimization 
and control of decentralized systems. With over a decade of 
experience applying data to business decision-making applications, 
Michael founded BlockScience, a firm concentrating on applying rigor 
to the design of the socio-technical network systems that will help 
build transformative products on the blockchain. 

Amit Garg,  CHIEF TECHNOLOGY OFFICER
Amit is a certified leader in information security with hands-on  
experience in management consulting, sales, business development 
and building stronger customer-service relationships. Amit, who has 
an intense entrepreneurial spirit, is passionate about providing value 
to clients. His work experience ranges from startups to U.S. federal 
agencies such as the Department of Defense and Fortune  
500 companies. 

TEAM AND PARTNERS9



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 40

Gustavo Guimarães 

Lead Smart Contract and  
Blockchain Architect

Ken Finch 

Global Business Development

Christopher Donville 

Director of Communications

Jan Bass 

Creative Director

Alexa Narma 

Marketing & Communications

Melissa Matos

Project Management

Olivia Lovenmark 

Social Media and Writing

Kirsten Montgomery 

Director of Finance and  
Resource Management

TEAM AND PARTNERS9



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 41

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Bowen Gao 

Director of Business Development 
Far East

Asad Zaman 

Education Development

Kris Yagel 

Chief Program Developer

Mohit Bansal 

 
Backend Systems Engineer,  

Salesforce Developer

Jill Huang

 
Technology and Translation 

Kari George 

Leadership and 
Project Management Consultant

10. ODEM Token Sale
Proceeds from the token distribution event will be used to fund the ODEM platform 
development, operations, legal establishment and marketing. ODEM SA does not make 
any claims about the use of the ODEM Token for any other purposes. Kindly note that any 
information mentioned in this chapter may change without notice before the launch of 
the main token sale.

TEAM AND PARTNERS, ODEM TOKEN SALE9, 10



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 42

The ODEM token sale will happen in two phases

1. Pre Token Sale - Early Adopter Phase

The pre-token sale phase will start on December 10th, 2017. In the pre-token sale, 
58,200,000 ODEMT will be issued at a discounted rate of €0.0375. These ODEMT will be 
issued at a 25 percent bonus rate. There is a minimum purchase requirement of 200,000 
ODEMT, per user, in the Pre-token sale phase.

2. Token Sale

The main token sale will commence on February 17th, 2018 and will continue until March 
19th, 2018. A total of 180 million ODEMT will be available in this phase. The tokens will 
be issued at, or around €0.05. Considering the fact that the ODEM platform can only 
perform optimally if the tokens are widely distributed, a user will be allowed to buy a 
maximum of 2,000,000 ODEMT during the first hour of the main token sale. After that, a 
maximum cap of 2,000,000 ODEMT will be lifted.

The number of ODEMT to be received per Ethereum will be updated 24 hours before the Token sale.

Details of the Contributors

Considering the global Token Sale regime, ODEM SA is committed to following certain 
best practices. The ODEM token sale will require KYC (Know Your Customer) and 
AML (Anti-money Laundering) protection measures to ensure contributors can legally 
participate in the token sale. ODEM believes in being a leader in the implementation of 
best practices. A KYC form will be available on the odem.io, homepage.

ODEM TOKEN SALE10



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 43

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Token Issuer ODEM SA

Total Tokens 396,969,697

Tokens to be sold via the Token sale 238,200,000

Short name ODEM

Type ERC20 of Ethereum blockchain

Accepted cryptocurrency Ether

AML/KYC requirement to participate in the 
Token sale

Yes

Pre Token Sale Details

Price per ODEM (pre Token sale) for 
58,200,000 ODEMT

€0.0375

Pre Token sale starting date and time Dec. 10, 2017, at 9 a.m. UTC

Pre Token sale ending date and time Dec. 31, 2017, at 9 a.m. UTC

Minimum buying limit 200,000 ODEMT

Maximum buying limit Nil

Token Sale Details

Price per ODEM (Token sale) for 
180,000,000

€0.05 (equivalent price in Ether will be 
updated 24 hours before the Token sale)

Token sale starting date Feb. 17, 2018 at 9 a.m. UTC

Token Sale ending date Mar. 19, 2018 at 9 a.m. UTC

Hard cap on the main token sale 180,000,000

Minimum buying limit Nil

Maximum buying limit 2,000,000 ODEM Tokens for first hour

NOTE: We will not collect more than €12 million net, excluding all token sale related commissions, 

marketing, legal and organizational expenses.

ODEM TOKEN SALE10



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 44

Distribution and Utilization of Proceeds

15% Pre ICO/Token Sale

18% Company

11% Bounty/ODEM Rewards

6% Advisors

5% Team

45% Main ICO

DISTRIBUTION

20% Supplier Development

20% Operations

30% Platform Development 20% Sales & Marketing

10% Legal

USE OF FUNDS

The contributions raised by ODEM SA will be used for the research and development of 
the ODEM platform and building out the marketplace. ODEM Rewards will be used to 
incentivize marketplace participants and will be used at the company’s discretion based 
on economic conditions.

Utilization of Funds Roadmap

In this section, we underline the business setup that we will construct from the 
contributions we receive from the token sale. We propose the following plan for the 
expected contributions which we may receive in this ODEMT token sale.

ODEM TOKEN SALE10



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 45

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Level 1 - €1 up to €3 million

Benefits:
• Limited functionality for educators to create profiles and content 

• Deploy on-chain transactions on Ethereum at limited capacity 

• ODEM Platform Beta Launch

• 1 physical office (Switzerland)

Team:
• 3 full time senior developers 

• 1 full time blockchain developer

• 1 full time sysadmin/quality assurance/support

• 1 full time consultant/sales engineer

Level 2 – €3 million to €6 million

Benefits:
• All Level 1 benefits

• Additional marketplace participants will be added (mentors and interpreters). 

• Recruitment of developer team to migrate majority of off chain transactions to 
on-chain ecosystem

• Additional branch office (China) 

• Develop course offerings for distributed ledger technology with social, political 
and technological impacts

ODEM TOKEN SALE10



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 46

Team:
• 4 full time senior developers 

• 2 full time blockchain developers

• 2 full time sysadmins/quality assurance /support

• 2 full time sales engineers/consultants

• 1 UI and mobile expert

• 1 legal advisor

• 1 business development specialist

• 4 senior professors from Ivy League/Swiss universities

Level 3 – €6 million to €12 million

Benefits:
• All level 2 benefits

• Additional marketplace participants will be added (accommodations and 
facilities).  

• All transactions occur on-chain and across additional selected blockchains

• Up to 5 physical offices in 5 target markets (Switzerland, Asia, India, S. America, 
Middle East)

• Pilot credentialing of selected education courses

• Pilot and testing of Video on Demand platform

• Free personalized education blockchain account tracking 

• Scholarship program for underprivileged students 

Team:
• 5 full time senior developers 

• 3 full time blockchain developers

• 2 full time sysadmins/quality assurance /support

• 4 full time sales engineers/consultants

• 2 UI and mobile expert

ODEM TOKEN SALE10



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 47

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

• 1 legal advisor

• 4 business development specialist

• Global marketing support

• 4 senior professors from Ivy League/Swiss universities 

• Education counsel and accreditation committee

• 1 human resource manager

VISION for Deliverables / Goals
• Live ODEM Platform fully functional based on specifications supplied above 

including:
 ◽ Interactive requests, bidding and fulfillment of educational programs
 ◽ Fully built-out participating communities in all areas including:

 ▪ Academia / Corporate / Speakers
 ▪ End clients (both executive and student)
 ▪ Web access for students, student representatives, educators and service 

providers to set up and become ODEM community members and partici- 
pate in buying and selling in the ODEM marketplace including:

 ▪ Speakers
 ▪ Corporate Engagement Managers
 ▪ Facilities
 ▪ Program creators, directors and coordinators
 ▪ Service providers like catering, transportation and outside activities

• Full ability to search, select and create new educational products

• Brand Awareness

• Completely active and engaged marketing campaign and ongoing  
marketing effort

• Fully functional help desk / support platform to accommodate new user 
onboarding and ongoing use

ODEM TOKEN SALE10



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 48

Future Development Plans and Features

In addition to the above listed use of funds for the first 18 months of growth, ODEM is 
researching and developing the following future enhancements:

•  Augment the in-person classroom experience to include:
 ◽ Live streaming of classroom experiences
 ◽ Synchronous and asynchronous offering of ODEM educational events as 

online courses
 ◽ Repurpose recorded and videotaped classroom events to be reused as online 

content for purchase
 ◽ Use of artificial intelligence (AI) for:

 ▪ AI-based student learning
 ▪ AI-based testing and assessment
 ▪ AI-bot to help buyers navigate choices and created education programs
 ▪ AI to AI smart contract creation and management to streamline requests 

among buyers and sellers
 ◽ Use of augmented reality (AR) in the classroom and online education 

experiences

• Extension of blockchain-based technology in the ODEM education model 
including:
 ◽ Creation of blockchain-based ODEM accreditation programs to be developed 

jointly by educators, participating institutions and students. (We are already 
seeing MIT move its graduation degrees to a blockchain-based model). This 
could also include integration of a blockchain academic grading and accredi- 
tation system. Features could include:

 ▪  Student earning academic credit from professors for
 ▪ Attendance and student understanding of classroom lectures
 ▪ Completion of classroom projects and assignments given

• Students having their academic history and success stored on the block- chain 
that will carry equal education value earned from traditional educational 
institutions.

• An accredited blockchain-based cross-border education institution, a global 
international school (ODEM University)

ODEM TOKEN SALE10



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 49

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

11.  Our Accountability with Your Contributions
We believe we must be transparent with contributors to the ODEM token sale as well as 
to the wider community. We pledge to keep all parties informed about the spending of 
funds raised in the ODEM token sale by preparing a formal Business Report at the end of 
each fiscal year.

We will disclose the following information in the report on our website:

1. Percentage of contributed amount spent in the preceding year, commencing from 
the date of the conclusion of the ODEM token sale or the last report end date;

2. Percentage of contributed amount spent on product development, in one fiscal 
year, commencing from the date of the conclusion of the ODEM token sale or the 
last report end date;

3. Percentage of contributed amount spent on marketing and public relations ex- 
penses, in one fiscal year, commencing from the date of the conclusion of the 
ODEM token sale or the last report end date;

4. Percentage of contributed amount spent on further research and development, in 
one fiscal year, commencing from the date of the conclusion of the ODEM token 
sale or the last report.

How Information Will be Shared

The information will be delivered to the public through the ODEM website at odem.io and 
through our telegram channel https://t.me/odemio.

The first Business Report, which will be prepared by an independent third party, will be 
published within the first quarter of 2019. It will cover the fiscal year ending in the third 
quarter of 2018. The report will be communicated on a rolling basis, annually, until ODEM 
Swiss SA has exhausted 80 percent of contributions.

ACCOUNTABILITY11



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 50

12. Resources

• [1] Carey, Kevin. The End of College: Creating the Future of Learning and the 
University of Everywhere:
 ◽ https://www.amazon.ca/End-College-Creating-Universi- ty-Everywhere/

dp/1594634041

• [2]  Excelorators:
 ◽ https://www.excelorators.com

• [3] Ethereum ERC 20 Token Standard:
 ◽ https://theethereum.wiki/w/index.php/ ERC20_Token_Standard

• [4] Harvard Business Review - How blockchain will accelerate business 
performance and power the smart economy:
 ◽ https://hbr.org/sponsored/2017/10/ how-blockchain-will-accelerate-business-

performance-and-power-the-smart-economy

• [5] KPMG Overview:
 ◽ https://home.kpmg.com/xx/en/home/about/overview.html

• [6] Mhaske, Yogesh, assistant professor at Sandip University on definitions of 
different types of education:
 ◽ https://www.slideshare.net/yogeshmhaske1/ types-of-education-66292303

• [7] National Institute for Learning Outcomes Assessment, http://www.learning- 
outcomesassessment.org/documents/BassisPrimer.pdf

• [8] PWC: A primer on blockchain technology:
 ◽ http://usblogs.pwc.com/emerg- ing-technology/a-primer-on-blockchain-

infographic/

• [9} SICOS:
 ◽ https://sicos.io/

• [10] Visual Capitalist - The Power of Smart Contracts on the Blockchain:
 ◽ https:// www.visualcapitalist.com/smart-contracts-blockchain/

• [11] Waite, Dan, Engaged Learning and the Future of Higher Education:
 ◽ https:// www.youtube.com/watch?v=TI41eqRpV2g

RESOURCES12



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 51

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

• MAD Network (Vision) White paper:
 ◽ https://madnetwork.io/MAD-Whitepaper.pdf

• MAD Network Technical White paper #1: 
 ◽ https://madnetwork.io/MAD-Technical-Whitepaper.pdf

• AdLedger Consortium — community building for Mad Network: 
 ◽ http://adledger.org/
 ◽ http://www.prweb.com/releases/2017/06/prweb14455059.htm

• Sweetbridge (Vision) White paper: 
 ◽ https://sweetbridge.com/public/docs/Sweetbridge-Whitepaper.pdf

• Sweetbridge Technical White paper #1:
 ◽ https://images.sweetbridge.org/main/Sweetbridge-WP-

LiquidityProtocolMath-v1-01.pdf

• Sweetbridge Alliance — community building:
 ◽ https://sweetbridge.com/alliance

• Truebit — verification games; protocol level work for scalability and tools for 
verifying validity of complex computations: 
 ◽ https://truebit.io/, https://people.cs.uchicago.edu/~teutsch/papers/truebit.pdf

• Stellar — blockchain aiming for maturity around payments across currencies and 
countries:
 ◽ https://www.stellar.org/, https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EA53r43vGCA
 ◽ https://www.stellar.org/papers/stellar-consensus-protocol.pdf

• ICO guidelines whitepaper: 
 ◽ https://www.stellar.org/blog/understanding-initial-coin-offerings/, http://bit.

ly/2hQRpT7

• Quorum — code base for launching project specific Ethereum-like blockchain 
networks:
 ◽ https://github.com/jpmorganchase/quorum/wiki/Quorum-Overview
 ◽ https://github.com/jpmorganchase/quorum-docs/blob/master/Quorum%20

Whitepaper%20v0.1.pdf

RESOURCES12



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 52

13. ODEMT, Legal, and Token Sale

Legal & Regulatory Opinion

GENERAL INFORMATIONS.

The ODEMT does not have the legal qualification of a security under Swiss law, since it 
does not give any rights to dividends or interests. The sale of ODEMTs are final and non-
refundable. ODEMTs are not shares and do not give any right to participate to the general 
meeting of ODEM SA. ODEMT cannot have a performance or a particular value outside 
the ODEM Platform. ODEMT shall therefore not be used or purchased for speculative 
or investment purposes. The purchaser of ODEMT is aware that national securities laws, 
which ensure that investors are sold investments that include all the proper disclosures 
and are subject to regulatory scrutiny for the investors’ protection, are not applicable.

Anyone purchasing ODEMT expressly acknowledges and represents that she/he has 
carefully reviewed this white paper and fully understands the risks, costs and benefits 
associated with the purchase of ODEMT.

KNOWLEDGE REQUIRED.

The purchaser of ODEMT undertakes that she/he understands and has significant 
experience of cryptocurrencies, blockchain systems and services, and that she/he fully 
understands the risks associated with the token sale as well as the mechanism related to 
the use of cryptocurrencies (incl. storage).

ODEM SA shall not be responsible for any loss of ODEMT or situations making it 
impossible to access ODEMTs, which may result from any actions or omissions of the user 
or any person undertaking to acquire ODEMTs, as well as in case of hacker attacks.

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 53

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

RISKS.

Acquiring ODEMT involves various risks, in particular but not limited to the fact that 
the ODEM SA may not be able to launch its operations and develop its platform due to 
technical and/or business difficulties or any other difficulties which is not foreseen for 
the ODEM SA at the time of the token sale. Therefore, and prior to acquiring ODEMT, 
the token buyer should carefully consider the risks, costs, and benefits of acquiring 
ODEMT within the pretoken sale event, and, if necessary, obtain independent advice in 
this regard. The token buyer who is not in the position to accept nor to understand the 
risks associated with the pre sale event (incl. the risks related to the non- development 
of the ODEM Platform and operations) or any other risks as mentioned below, should not 
acquire ODEMT, at this stage or later.

The following brief description of certain risk factors shall be considered along with 
other matters discussed elsewhere in this Whitepaper and the Terms & Conditions. 
The following however, does not purport to be a comprehensive summary of all the 
risks associated with a participation of the token sale of ODEMT generally. Rather, the 
following are only certain particular risks to which the token sale may be subject that 
ODEM wishes to encourage prospective token buyers to discuss in detail with their 
professional advisors.

INTERRUPTIONS IN IT SYSTEMS COULD MATERIALLY ADVERSELY AFFECT 
BUSINESS PERFORMANCE.

The ODEM Platform is entirely dependent on the secure operation of its websites and 
systems as well as the operation of the Internet generally. Its business may involve the 
storage and transmission of customers’ proprietary information, and security breaches 
could expose the ODEM SA to a risk of loss or misuse of this information, and to resulting 
claims and litigation. A number of large Internet companies have suffered security 
breaches, many of which have involved intentional attacks. From time to time ODEM SA 
and many other Internet businesses also experience denial of service attacks in which 
attackers attempt to block customers’ access to any or all of its product, software and 
platforms, including but not limited to its website. If the ODEM SA is unable to avert a 
denial of service attack for any significant period, it could sustain substantial revenue loss 

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 54

from lost sales and customer dissatisfaction. The ODEM SA may not have the resources 
or technical sophistication to anticipate or prevent rapidly evolving types of cyber-
attacks. Cyber-attacks may target the ODEM SA, its customers, its suppliers, banks, 
credit card processors, delivery services, e-commerce in general or the communication 
infrastructure on which it depends. If an actual or perceived attack or breach of its 
security occurs, customer and/or supplier perception of the effectiveness of its security 
measures could be harmed and the ODEM SA could lose customers, suppliers or both. 
Actual or anticipated attacks and risks may cause the ODEM SA to incur increasing 
costs, including costs to deploy additional personnel and protection technologies, train 
employees, and engage third party experts and consultants.

A person who is able to circumvent security measures might be able to misappropriate 
his/her or his/her customers’ proprietary information, cause interruption in operations, 
damage computers or those of customers, or otherwise damage reputation and business. 
Any compromise of security could result in a violation of applicable privacy and other 
laws, significant legal and financial exposure, damage to its reputation, and a loss of 
confidence in security measures, which could harm the ODEM’s SA’s business.

Any significant interruption to the efficient and uninterrupted operation the ODEM SA’s 
information technology applications, systems and networks, including, but not limited to, 
new system implementations, facility issues or energy blackouts, could have a material 
adverse impact on the ODEM SA’s operations and operating results. The protective 
measures adopted to avoid system or network disruptions may be insufficient to prevent 
or limit the damage from any future disruptions, and any such disruption could have an 
adverse effect on ODEMT’s and the ODEM SA’s business, financial condition and results 
of operations. All of these risks may lead to diminished opportunity and/or marginal 
utility in token buyers exchanging ODEMT tokens for educational services.

RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH INTERNATIONAL OPERATIONS.

The ODEM SA is subject to numerous evolving and complex laws and regulations which 
apply, among other things, to financial reporting standards, corporate governance, 
data privacy, tax, competitive practices and regulations in each jurisdiction in which 
they operate. In the jurisdictions in which they operate, each respective member of 
the ODEM SA would need to comply with various standards and practices of different 

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 55

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

regulatory, tax, judicial and administrative bodies. There are a number of risks associated 
with international business operations, including political instability (e.g., the threat 
of war, terrorist attacks or civil unrest), inconsistent regulations across jurisdictions, 
unanticipated changes in the regulatory environment, and import and export restrictions.  
Any of these events may affect its employees, reputation, business or financial results 
as well as its ability to meet its objectives, including the following international business 
risks:

• negative economic developments in economies around the world and the 
instability of governments, or the downgrades in the debt ratings of certain major 
economies;

• social and political instability;

• complex regulations governing certain of its products;

• potential terrorist attacks;

• adverse changes in governmental policies, especially those affecting trade and 
investment;

• foreign currency exchange; and

• threats that its operations or property could be subject to nationalization and 
expropriation.

All member of the ODEM SA may not be in full compliance at all times with the laws 
and regulations to which each such member of the ODEM SA is subject. Likewise, the 
ODEM SA may not have obtained or may not be able to obtain the permits and other 
authorizations or licenses that it would need. If any member of the ODEM SA violates 
or fails to comply with laws, regulations, permits, health and safety regulations or other 
authorizations or licenses, it could be fined or otherwise sanctioned by regulators. In such 
a case, or if any of these international business risks were to materialize, the business, 
financial condition and results of operations, and thus the exchangeability and utility of 
the ODEMT tokens, could be adversely affected.

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 56

THE ODEM SA MAY BE FORCED TO CEASE OPERATIONS OR TAKE ACTIONS 
THAT RESULT IN A DISSOLUTION EVENT.

It is possible that, due to any number of reasons, including, but not limited to, an 
unfavorable fluctuation in the value of cryptographic and fiat currencies, the inability by 
the ODEM SA to establish the ODEMT’s utility, the failure of commercial relationships, 
intellectual property ownership challenges or governmental or regulatory actions or 
proceedings, the ODEM SA may no longer be viable to operate and may dissolve or take 
actions that result in a dissolution event.

THE LOSS OF KEY PERSONNEL OR ANY INABILITY TO ATTRACT AND 
RETAIN ADDITIONAL PERSONNEL COULD AFFECT THE ODEM SA’S ABILITY 
TO SUCCESSFULLY GROW ITS BUSINESS.

The ODEM SA’s performance is substantially dependent on the continued services and 
on the performance of its favorites and senior management and other key personnel. 
The loss of the services, of any such person for any reason could harm the ODEM SA’s 
business.  The ODEM SA’s future success also depends on its ability to identify, attract, 
hire, train, retain and motivate other highly-skilled technical, managerial, editorial, 
merchandising, marketing and customer service personnel. Competition for such 
personnel is intense. The failure to retain and attract the necessary technical, managerial, 
editorial, merchandising, marketing and customer service personnel could harm the 
ODEM SA’s business and this affect the ability and prepaid ability of token buyers of 
ODEMTs to exchange them for services.

The ODEMTs and any related blockchain platforms, as well as the ODEM SA’s existing 
cloud suite and online platforms, may be the target of malicious cyber attacks or may 
contain exploitable flaws in its underlying code (such as distributed denial of service 
attacks, double-spend attacks, 51% attacks, or other malicious attacks), which may result 
in security breaches and the loss or theft of ODEMTs. If cyber security is compromised or 
if the ODEMTs and related platforms are subjected to attacks that frustrate or thwart its 
customers’ ability to access or use their tokens, the token buyers of ODEMTs may suffer 
losses in value or otherwise be materially adversely affected.

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 57

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

THE REGULATORY REGIME GOVERNING THE BLOCKCHAIN 
TECHNOLOGIES, CRYPTOCURRENCIES, TOKENS AND TOKEN SALES SUCH 
AS ODEMT IS UNCERTAIN OR NONEXISTENT IN MANY JURISDICTIONS, 
AND NEW REGULATIONS OR POLICIES MAY MATERIALLY ADVERSELY 
AFFECT THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE ODEM SA’S EXCHANGE OF ODEMT 
TOKENS FOR SERVICES.

As blockchain networks and blockchain assets have grown in popularity and in market 
size, federal and state agencies have begun to take interest in, and in some cases 
regulate, their use and operation.

Regulation of tokens (including ODEMT) and token sales such as this, cryptocurrencies, 
blockchain technologies and cryptocurrency exchanges is largely undeveloped and 
likely to rapidly evolve, varies significantly among international, federal, state and local 
jurisdictions and is subject to significant uncertainty in legal and regulatory interpretation 
and enforcement. Various legislative and executive bodies in the United States and in 
other countries may in the future, adopt laws, regulations, guidance, or other actions, 
which may materially adversely affect or otherwise severely impact the development 
and growth of the ODEM SA and the adoption and utility of ODEMT. Failure of any 
party to comply with any laws, rules and regulations, some of which may not exist yet or 
are subject to interpretation and may be subject to change, could result in a variety of 
adverse consequences, including criminal and civil penalties, suspension of trading and 
fines.

THE EFFORT TO DEVELOP CODE FOR THE PURPOSES OF FACILITATING 
THE CREATIONS OF PROGRAMS AND PLATFORMS SET FORTH HEREIN 
MAY BE AN AREA IN WHICH THE ODEM SA HAS LIMITED EXPERIENCE, 
MAY BE EXPENSIVE, AND SUBJECT TO THE RESOLUTION OF SIGNIFICANT 
TECHNICAL CONSTRAINTS.

The ODEM SA is working to develop code for the purposes of facilitating the creation 
of the programs and platforms set forth herein. Although the ODEM SA has hired and 
will hire employees with significant experience in the technical workings of blockchain, 
Ethereum and other cryptocurrencies, the ODEM SA does not have significant experience 

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 58

with such types of projects. These projects may be expensive, and are subject to 
substantial risk that they may ultimately be unsuccessful. Further, the creation thereof 
would be subject to the future resolution of numerous significant technical challenges 
which may be insurmountable.

Blockchain networks also face an uncertain regulatory landscape in many other 
jurisdictions such as the European Union, China and Russia. Various foreign jurisdictions 
may, in the near future, adopt laws, regulations or directives that materially adversely 
affect or otherwise severely impact the ODEM SA. Such laws, regulations or directives 
may conflict with those of the United States or may directly and negatively impact its 
business. The effect of any future regulatory change is impossible to predict, but such 
change could be substantial and materially adverse to the development and growth of 
the ODEM SA and the adoption, utility and transferability of the ODEMT.

TOKEN BUYERS OF ODEMT WILL HAVE NO VOTING RIGHTS, CONSENT 
RIGHTS OR OTHER CONTROL OVER THE ODEM SA.

Token buyers are not and will not be entitled, to vote or receive dividends or be deemed 
the holder of capital stock of the ODEM SA, nor will anything be construed to confer 
on the token buyers any of the rights of a stockholder of the ODEM SA or any right to 
vote for the election of directors or upon any matter submitted to stockholders at any 
meeting thereof, or to give or withhold consent to any corporate action or to receive 
notice of meetings, or to receive subscription rights or otherwise.

ODEMTS HAVE NO OPERATING HISTORY.

ODEMTs will be a newly formed token and has no operating history.  Each token buyer 
should evaluate on the basis that information herein or otherwise provided to such token 
buyer or any third party’s assessment of the prospects of the ODEM SA or the ODEMTs 
may not prove accurate. Past performance of tokens or coins issued by any other person 
or entity, including without limitation Bitcoin or Ethereum, is not predictive of the value 
of the ODEMTs in the future.

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 59

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

THE FURTHER DEVELOPMENT AND ACCEPTANCE OF BLOCKCHAIN 
NETWORKS, WHICH ARE PART OF A NEW AND RAPIDLY CHANGING 
INDUSTRY, ARE SUBJECT TO A VARIETY OF FACTORS THAT ARE DIFFICULT 
TO EVALUATE. THE SLOWING OR STOPPING OF THE DEVELOPMENT OR 
ACCEPTANCE OF BLOCKCHAIN NETWORKS AND BLOCKCHAIN ASSETS 
WOULD HAVE A MATERIAL ADVERSE EFFECT ON THE SUCCESSFUL 
DEVELOPMENT AND ADOPTION OF THE ODEM PLATFORM AND 
PROPOSED PROJECTS, AS WELL AS THE ODEMTS THEMSELVES.

The growth of the blockchain industry in general, as well as the blockchain networks 
with which the ODEM SA will rely and interact, is subject to a high degree of uncertainty. 
The factors affecting the further development of the cryptocurrency industry, as well as 
blockchain networks include, without limitation:

• Worldwide growth in the adoption and use of Bitcoin and other blockchain 
technologies;

• Government and quasi-government regulation of Bitcoin cryptocurrency and 
other blockchain assets and their use and exchangeability, or restrictions on or 
regulation of access to and operation of blockchain networks or similar systems;

• The maintenance and development of the open-source software protocol of the 
Bitcoin and other networks;

• Changes in consumer demographics and public tastes and preferences;

• The availability and popularity of other forms or methods of buying and selling 
goods and services, or trading assets including new means of using fiat currencies 
or existing networks;

• The nature and extent of cyberattacks, protocol forks and cryptocurrency co- 
participant fraud;

• General economic conditions and the regulatory environment relating to 
cryptocurrencies; and

• A decline in the popularity or acceptance of Bitcoin or other blockchain-based 
tokens and coins would adversely affect its results of operations.

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 60

The slowing or stopping of the development, general acceptance and adoption and 
usage of blockchain networks and blockchain assets may deter or delay the acceptance 

and adoption of the ODEMT.

TRANSFERABILITY AND LIQUIDITY RISKS

Eligible Token Buyers (as defined below) will have the right to transfer ODEMT to other 
Eligible Token Buyers provided such transferee is not subject to certain other restrictions 
either pursuant to applicable laws or otherwise. Token buyers should take into account 
that a liquid, secondary trading market for the ODEMT may not exist. Token buyers will 
be fully required to bear the financial risks of their purchase decision in ODEMT.

THE PRICES OF BLOCKCHAIN ASSETS ARE EXTREMELY VOLATILE. 
FLUCTUATIONS IN THE PRICE OF DIGITAL ASSETS COULD MATERIALLY 
AND ADVERSELY AFFECT THE ODEM SA’S BUSINESS, AND THE ODEMTS MAY 
ALSO BE SUBJECT TO SIGNIFICANT PRICE VOLATILITY.

The prices of blockchain assets such as Bitcoin have historically been subject to dramatic 
fluctuations and are highly volatile, and the market price of the ODEMTs may also be 
highly volatile. Several factors may influence the market price of the ODEMTs, including, 
but not limited to:

• Global blockchain asset supply;

• Global blockchain asset demand, which can be influenced by the growth of 
retail merchants’ and commercial businesses’ acceptance of blockchain assets 
like cryptocurrencies as payment for goods and services, the security of online 
blockchain asset exchanges and digital wallets that hold blockchain assets, the 
perception that the use and holding of blockchain assets is safe and secure, and 
the regulatory restrictions on their use;

• Purchasers’ expectations of changes in the value of blockchain assets with respect 
to the rate of inflation;

• Changes in the software, software requirements or hardware requirements 
underlying the ODEM Platform;

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 61

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

• Changes in the rights, obligations, incentives, or rewards for the various 
participants in the ODEM Platform;

• Interest rates;

• Currency exchange rates, including the rates at which digital assets may be 
exchanged for fiat currencies;

• Change in Fiat currency withdrawal and deposit policies of blockchain asset 
exchanges on which the ODEMTs may be traded and liquidity on such exchanges;

• Interruptions in service from or failures of major blockchain asset exchanges on 
which the ODEMTs may be exchanged;

• Monetary policies of governments, trade restrictions, currency devaluations and 
revaluations;

• Regulatory measures, if any, that affect the use of blockchain assets such as the 
ODEMTs;

RISK OF LOSING ACCESS TO ODEMTS DUE TO LOSS OF PRIVATE KEY(S), 
CUSTODIAL ERROR OR PURCHASER ERROR

A private key, or a combination of private keys, may be deemed a necessary element 
to control and, transact or negotiate ODEMTs stored in your digital wallet or vault. 
Accordingly, loss of requisite private key(s) associated with the digital wallet or vault 
storing ODEMTs will result in loss of such ODEMTs. Moreover, any third party that gains 
access to such private key(s), including by gaining access to login credentials of a digital 
wallet or vault service you use, may be able to misappropriate ODEMTs. Any errors or 
malfunctions caused by or otherwise related to the digital wallet or vault token buyer 
choose to receive and store ODEMTs, including token buyers own failure to properly 
maintain or use such digital wallet or vault, may also result in the loss of your ODEMTs. 
Additionally, token buyer’s failure to follow precisely the procedures specifically set forth 
for buying and receiving, transacting or negotiating ODEMTs, including, for instance, 
providing the wrong address for receiving ODEMTs, may result in the loss of your 
ODEMTs.

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 62

RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH THE ETHEREUM PROTOCOL.

Because ODEMTs are based on the Ethereum protocol, any malfunction, breakdown, 
abandonment or facts of the Ethereum protocol or other issues involving the related 
Ethereum infrastructure, wallet design, implementation factors, internet failures, 
malware, spoofing, phishing, spear phishing, poor software design, use of pre-released 
or unproven, non- reviewed software or malicious co-participant actions may have a 
material adverse effect on the ODEMTs. Moreover, advances in cryptography, or technical 
advances such as the development of quantum computing, could present risks to 
ODEMTs, including the utility of ODEMTs for obtaining services, by rendering ineffective 
the cryptographic consensus mechanism that underpins the Ethereum protocol.

RISK OF MINING ATTACKS

As with other decentralized cryptographic tokens based on the Ethereum protocol, 
ODEMTs are susceptible to attacks by miners in the course of validating ODEMTs 
transactions on the Ethereum blockchain, including, but not limited, to double-spend 
attacks, majority mining power attacks, and selfish-mining attacks. Any successful 
attacks present a risk to the ODEMTs, including, but not limited to, accurate execution 
and recording of transactions involving ODEMTs.

RISK OF HACKING AND SECURITY WEAKNESSES.

Hackers or other malicious groups or organizations may attempt to interfere with the 
ODEMTs in a variety of ways, including, but not limited to, malware attacks, denial 
of service attacks, consensus-based attacks, Sybil attacks, smurfing and spoofing. 
Furthermore, because the ODEMTs are based on open-source software, there is 
a risk that a third party or a member of the ODEM SA’s team may intentionally or 
unintentionally introduce weaknesses into the core infrastructure of the ODEMTs, which 
could negatively affect the ODEMTs, including ODEMT’s utility for obtaining services.

Acquiring ODEMT and storing them involves various risks, in particular the risk that the 
ODEM platform may not be able to launch its operations and develop its blockchain 
and provide the services promised. Therefore, and prior to acquiring ODEMTs, any 

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 63

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

user should carefully consider the risks, costs and benefits of acquiring ODEMT in the 
context of the token sale and, if necessary, obtain any independent advice in this regard. 
Any interested person who is not in the position to accept or to understand the risks 
associated with the activity (incl. the risks related to the non-development of the ODEM 
platform) or any other risks as indicated in the Terms & Conditions of the token sale 
should not acquire ODEMTs.

Important disclaimer

This white paper shall not and cannot be considered as an invitation to enter into an 
investment. It does not constitute or relate in any way nor should be considered as an 
offering of securities in any jurisdiction. The white paper does not include nor contain 
any information or indication that might be considered as a recommendation or that 
might be use to base any investment decision. This document does not constitute an 
offer or an invitation to sell shares, securities or rights belonging to ODEM SA or any 
related or associated ODEM SA. The ODEMT is just a utility token which can be used only 
on the ODEM platform and is not intended to be used as an investment.

The offering of ODEMT on a trading platform is done in order to allow the use of the 
ODEM platform and not for speculative purposes. The offering of ODEMT on a trading 
platform is not changing the legal qualification of the token, which remains a simple 
means for the use of the ODEM platform and is not a security.

ODEM SA is not to be considered as advisor in any legal, tax or financial matters. Any 
information in the white paper is given for general information purpose only and ODEM 

SA does not provide with any warranty as to the accuracy and completeness of this 
information. Given the lack of crypto-token qualifications in most countries, each token 
buyer is strongly advised to carry out a legal and tax analysis concerning the purchase 
and ownership of ODEMTs according to their nationality and place of residence.

ODEM SA  is not a financial intermediary according to Swiss Law and is not required 
to obtain any authorization for Anti Money Laundering purpose. This qualification may 
change in case ODEM SA will offer services which are to be considered as qualifying and 
a financial intermediation activity. In this case, the use of ODEM SA’s ODEM platform and 
services may require the positive conclusion of a AML/KYC identification process. 

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 64

ODEMTs confer no direct or indirect right to ODEM SA’s capital or income, nor does it 
confer any governance right within ODEM SA; an ODEMT is not proof of ownership or 
a right of control over ODEM SA and does not grant the controlling individual any asset 
or share in ODEM SA, or in the ODEM platform. An ODEMT does not grant any right to 
participate in control over ODEM SA’s management or decision-making set-up, or over 
the ODEM platform and governance to the Purchasers.

Regulatory authorities are carefully scrutinizing businesses and operations associated 
to cryptocurrencies in the world. In that respect, regulatory measures, investigations or 
actions may impact ODEM SA’s business and even limit or prevent it from developing 
its operations in the future. Any person undertaking to acquire ODEMT must be aware 
of  ODEM SA’s business model, the white paper or terms and conditions may change or 
need to be modified because of new regulatory and compliance requirements from any 
applicable laws in any jurisdictions. In such a case, purchasers and anyone undertaking 
to acquire ODEMT acknowledge and understand that neither ODEM SA nor any of its 
affiliates shall be held liable for any direct or indirect loss or damage caused by such 
changes.

ODEM SA will do its utmost to launch its operations and develop the ODEM platform. 
Anyone undertaking to acquire ODEMT acknowledges and understands that ODEM 
SA does not provide any guarantee that it will manage to achieve it. On concluding the 
Commercial Operation, these tokens will be issued by a technical process referred to as 
a token generation event. This is an open source IT protocol over which the ODEM SA 
has no rights or liability in terms of its development and operation. The token distribution 
mechanism will be controlled by a Smart Contract; this involves a computer program that 
can be executed on the Ethereum network or on a blockchain network that is compatible 
with Smart Contract programming language. They acknowledge and understand 
therefore that ODEM SA (including its bodies and employees) assumes no liability or 
responsibility for any loss or damage that would result from or relate to the incapacity to 
use ODEMTs, except in case of intentional misconduct or gross negligence.

ODEMT is based on the Ethereum protocol. Therefore, any malfunction, unplanned 
function or unexpected operation of the Ethereum protocol may cause the ODEM 
platform or ODEMTs to malfunction or operate in a way that is not expected. Ether, the 
native Ethereum Protocol account unit may itself lose value in a similar way to ODEMTs, 

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 65

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

and also in other ways.

Representation and warranties

By participating in the token sale, the purchaser represents and warrants that the token 
buyer is a eligible token buyer (“Eligible Token Buyer”) by agreeing to the above and in 
particular that they:

• have read carefully the Terms & Conditions attached to the White paper; agree to 
their full contents and accept to be legally bound by them;

• have read and fully understood the Whitepaper and the risks attached to the 
ODEMT token sale;

• are authorized and have full power to purchase ODEMT according to the laws that 
apply in their jurisdiction of domicile;

• are not a U.S. citizen, resident or entity (a “U.S. Person”) nor are they purchasing 
ODEMT or signing on behalf of a U.S. Person;

• you are neither a citizen or permanent resident of the Socialist Republic 
of Vietnam nor resident of a country where American and United Nations 
embargoes and sanctions are in force, namely Balkan, Belarus, Burma, Cote 
D’Ivoire (Ivory Coast), Cuba, Democratic Republic of Congo, Iran, Iraq, Liberia, 
North Korea, Sudan, Syria, Zimbabwe, Moldova

• live in a jurisdiction which allows ODEM SA to sell ODEMT through a token sale 
without requiring any local authorization and are in compliance with the local, 
state, and national laws and regulations when purchasing, selling and/or using 
ODEMTs;

• are familiar with all related regulations in the specific jurisdiction in which they 
are based and that purchasing cryptographic tokens in that jurisdiction is not 
prohibited, restricted or subject to additional conditions of any kind;

• will not use ODEM token sale for any illegal activity, including but not limited to 
money laundering and the financing of terrorism;

Governing law – Arbitration

The Client acknowledges and accepts that the ODEM token sale operation is taking place 
within a Swiss legal environment that is still under development. The Parties agree to 
seek an amicable settlement prior to bringing any legal action. All disputes arising with 

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 66

the with papers provided, shall be resolved by arbitration in accordance with the Swiss 
Rules of International Arbitration of the Swiss Chambers of Commerce in force on the 
date when the Notice of Arbitration is submitted in accordance with these Rules. The 
arbitration panel shall consist of one arbitrator only. The seat of the arbitration shall be 
Lugano, Switzerland. The arbitral proceedings shall be conducted in English.

ODEMTs will not be listed on any regulated stock exchange, such as SIX Swiss Exchange, 
or SIX. These Terms have been prepared without regard to the legal standards for 
prospectuses under art. 1156 or art. 652a of the Swiss Code of Obligations or the legal 
standards for facilitated prospectuses under art. 5 of the Collective Investment Schemes 
Act (“CISA”) or art. 27 ff. of the SIX Listing Rules or the listing rules of any other stock 
exchange in Switzerland. Neither these Terms nor any other material relating to the Offer, 
ODEM SA , the ODEM platform or ODEMTs will be or have been filed with or approved 
by any Swiss regulatory authority. Specifically, these Terms will not be filed with, and 
the Offer of ODEMTs will not be supervised by, the Swiss Financial Market Supervisory 
Authority FINMA (FINMA). Furthermore, the Offer of ODEMTs has not been and will 
not be authorized under the CISA. Thus, the protection which is given to purchasers of 
interests or units in collective investment schemes under the CISA does not extend to 
purchasers of ODEMTs.

ODEMT, LEGAL, AND TOKEN SALE13



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission Page | 67

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

14. Appendix A: Glossary of Terms

AML: Anti-money Laundering refers to a set of international regulations, laws and 
procedures intended to halt the practice of legitimizing the proceeds of illegal activity.

Blockchain Technology: The foundation of cryptocurrencies like Bitcoin and others, 
a blockchain features a historical ledger of transactions that is updated by appending 
blocks.

Business Report: An annual summary of spending of ODEM token sale proceeds. The 
report will be distributed to token holders.

Digital Wallet: An online or mobile account in which users can store all payment 
information along with private keys for any cryptocurrency or tokens held.

ERC 20 Ethereum Token Standard: The requirements that govern how new 
cryptographic tokens can be launched on top of the Ethereum blockchain.

ETH: The short form of Ether, the Ethereum blockchain digital currency.

Ethereum: A blockchain designed specifically to encourage development of smart 
contract platforms.

Excelorators Inc.: A San Francisco-based provider of education and travel experiences 
at elite universities and top corporate campuses.

KYC: Know Your Customer refers to steps taken to identify and verify the identity of a 
ODEM SA’s clients. The process is part of efforts to halt money laundering.

Off-Chain: A transaction that occurs off of the blockchain.

APPENDIX A: GLOSSARY OF TERMS14



White Paper

‘17

Copyright © ODEM 2017 
No duplication of any part of this document allowed without permission

ODEM Whitepaper Draft v1.6 March 2018

Page | 68

On-Chain: A transaction that occurs on the blockchain.

Private Key: Data that allows access the tokens in a specific wallet. It functions as a 
password that should be hidden by the wallet owner.

Smart Contracts: Decentralized applications that facilitate financial exchanges for 
services. Smart contracts are also known as self-executing contracts.

Telegram Channel: A means of distributing information about a specific utility token 
or platform.

Terms & Conditions: The terms of the token sale of ODEMT.

Token: A form of cryptocurrency created by a startup to fund development of block- 
chain-related product ideas. So-called utility token may also be used to facilitate 
transactions on a blockchain.

APPENDIX A: GLOSSARY OF TERMS14


	Notice
	1.	Vision
	2.	Executive Summary
	3.	The Problem/The Market Place
	4.	The ODEM Solution
	5.	Technology Platform
	6.	Timeline
	7.	ODEM Financial Ecosystem
	8.	Advantages 
	9.	Team and Partners
	10.	ODEM Token Sale
	11.	 Our Accountability with Your Contributions
	12.	Resources
	13.	ODEMT, Legal, and Token Sale
	14.	Appendix A: Glossary of Terms

